Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 5 Administration

47-20-50.
Effective date of enacted retirement bill with fiscal impact; unfunded enacted bills; requirements for retirement bills having fiscal impact.

Any retirement bill having a fiscal impact which is enacted by the General Assembly and which is approved by the Governor or which otherwise becomes law shall become effective on the first day of July immediately following the regular session during which it was enacted, but only if the enacted bill is concurrently funded as provided by this Code section. If an enacted bill, including one approved by the Governor, is not concurrently funded as required by this Code section, then such bill may not become effective as law and shall be null, void, and of no force and effect and shall stand repealed in its entirety on the first day of July immediately following its enactment.

When a retirement bill having a fiscal impact amends a retirement system having employer contributions funded from appropriations by the General Assembly, then appropriations for the first fiscal year of effectiveness of the bill, after it becomes law, must include funds to pay the amount determined by the actuarial investigation under paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-36 or subsection (b) of Code Section 47-20-37, and future appropriations for subsequent fiscal years must include an amount necessary to maintain the actuarial soundness of the retirement system in accordance with the findings of the actuarial investigation. Any limitation on the rate of employer contributions that may be included in a law which is the source of authority for a retirement system affected by this subsection shall be amended to the extent necessary to comply with the requirements of this subsection.

When a retirement bill having a fiscal impact amends a retirement system having employer contributions funded from portions of fines and forfeitures, then, if necessary to produce funds to pay the amount determined by actuarial investigation under paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-36, either:

The retirement bill having a fiscal impact or parallel legislation, which must become effective concurrently with the retirement bill, must revise the portion of fines and forfeitures designated for employer contributions to pay the amount determined under paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-36; or

The General Assembly by direct appropriations must supplement employer contributions from fines and forfeitures to the extent necessary to pay the amount determined under paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-36.

When a retirement bill having a fiscal impact amends a retirement system having employer contributions funded from the designation of the proceeds of a tax imposed by law, then either:

The retirement bill having a fiscal impact or parallel legislation, which must become effective concurrently with the retirement bill, must revise the tax as necessary to pay the amount determined under paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-36; or

The General Assembly by direct appropriation must supplement employer contributions from the tax to the extent necessary to pay the amount determined under paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-36.

When a retirement bill having a fiscal impact amends a retirement system having employer contributions funded wholly or partially from the funds of a political subdivision, that political subdivision shall have a duty to produce funds as necessary to pay all or its proportionate share of the amount determined by actuarial investigation under paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-36.

When a retirement bill having a fiscal impact creates a new retirement system, then employer contributions in conformity with the minimum funding standards of Code Section 47-20-10 and in conformity with paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-36 must be made to the retirement system either by direct appropriations by the General Assembly or by another source of employer contributions specifically provided for in the bill creating the new retirement system.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-50

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1368, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 240, § 7; Ga. L. 1995, p. 331, § 2.

47-20-50.1.
Report of funding of retirement bills having a fiscal impact; publication.

Following the close of each regular legislative session during which retirement bills having a fiscal impact may be enacted, the state auditor shall make a determination for each such bill enacted during such session, which is not vetoed by the Governor, of whether or not provision has been made for the concurrent funding of the bill in conformity with the applicable requirements of Code Section 47-20-50.

The director of the Office of Planning and Budget, the legislative budget analyst, retirement system administrators, and employers shall provide such information and assistance as may be necessary for the state auditor to make the determinations required by subsection (a) of this Code section.

The state auditor shall make the determinations required by subsection (a) of this Code section by not later than the fifteenth day immediately following the last day on which the Governor is authorized to veto bills following the close of each regular legislative session. The state auditor’s findings shall be made in a report to the Secretary of State showing the determination for each retirement bill by reference to the respective Senate or House number for the bill. The report shall be submitted to the Secretary of State by not later than the last day on which the state auditor is required to make the determinations. The Secretary of State shall cause the state auditor’s report to be printed in the annual session laws of the State of Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-50.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 240, § 8; Ga. L. 1989, p. 52, § 1.

47-20-51.
Accrued retirement benefits are not created, enhanced, or diminished by this chapter.

No provision of this chapter generally and no provision of Code Section 47-20-50 in particular shall:

Create or be construed to create a contractual right to a retirement benefit or a contractual right in the provisions of a retirement system law which does not exist independently of the provisions of this chapter; and

Impair, alter, or diminish or be construed to impair, alter, or diminish a contractual right to a retirement benefit or a contractual right in the provisions of a retirement system law which exists independently of the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-51

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1368, § 1.